csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Cnj_i.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijisiiwegibanen,miijisiiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwiingibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijiwegibanen,miijiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwiingibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiweg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigwaa
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisinig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijising
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyeg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaad
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijing
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijisiwegiban,miijisiwegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigwaaban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisinigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisingiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijiyegiban,miijiyegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaapan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijingiban
